Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 3. Killing Animals to Ascertain Ownership

Cross references. —

For definition of the term “inspectors,” see §

11-20-101

.

As to criminal offenses concerning livestock and other animals, see §§

11-30-104

and

11-30-106

to

11-30-115

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

4 Am. Jur. 2d Animals § 1 et seq.

3A C.J.S. Animals §§ 10, 16 to 30, 123 to 169, 320 to 323.

§ 11-20-301.
When authorized.

If in the opinion of
any authorized brand inspector or sheriff a mark or brand upon any
livestock has been fraudulently altered, obliterated or defaced so
the original mark or brand cannot be determined by external inspection,
the brand inspector or sheriff may seize and kill the animal to ascertain
the mark or brand altered or defaced.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 18, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 67-301; C.S. 1945, § 56-1001; W.S. 1957, § 11-395; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-401; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-20-302.
Sale of carcass.

The carcass of any animal
killed except such part as is retained for evidence, shall be promptly
sold at public or private sale by the stock inspector or sheriff,
and the proceeds paid into the general fund of the county in which
the animal was killed.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 18, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 67-303; C.S. 1945, § 56-1003; W.S. 1957, § 11-397; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-403; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to hides and carcasses, see §§

11-23-101

to

11-23-305

.